Hawaii statutes.
§490:2-707 "Person in the position of
a seller". (1) A "person in the position of a seller"
includes as against a principal an agent who has paid or become responsible for
the price of goods on behalf of his principal or anyone who otherwise holds a
security interest or other right in goods similar to that of a seller.

(2) A person in the position of a seller may
as provided in this article withhold or stop delivery (section 490:2-705) and
resell (section 490:2-706) and recover incidental damages (section 490:2-710).
[L 1965, c 208, §2-707; HRS §490:2-707]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next